old/other/tt/hyph_tt_RU.dic
UTF-8
.ави2
.авү2
.ад1р
.ад1р
.ади2
.адү2
.аи2
.аү2
.ак1в
.ак1в
.ак1р
.ак1р
.аль5
.аль5
.ас1п
.ас1п
.ау2
.ау2
.аш1х
.аш1һ
.аэ2
.аэ2
.бе2з1а2
.бә2з1а2
.бе2з1у2
.бә2з1у2
.бе2з3о2
.бә2з3ө2
.бе2с1т
.бә2с1т
.без1на
.бәз1ңа
.без1р
.бәз1р
.би2б1л
.бү2б1л
.бу1г
.бу1һ
.взъ2
.взъ2
.во1в2
.вө1в2
.во2п1л
.вө2п1л
.во2с3тор
.вө2с3төр
.во2ск
.вө2ск
.во3п2ло
.вө3п2лө
.воз1на
.вөз1ңа
.вс6п
.вс6п
.въ2
.въ2
.вып2ле
.вүп2лә
.выс2п
.вүс2п
.гос1к
.һөс1к
.дво2е
.двө2ә
.де2зи
.дә2зү
.ди2а
.дү2а
.ди2сто
.дү2стө
.до1см
.дө1см
.за3в2ра
.за3в2ра
.за3п2н
.за3п2ң
.зас2
.зас2
.зау2
.зау2
.заш2
.заш2
.звуко3
.звукө3
.зо2о3
.зө2ө3
.иг1л
.үһ1л
.иг1р
.үһ1р
.ие2
.үә2
.из1н
.үз1ң
.из1р
.үз1р
.изо2бл
.үзө2бл
.ии2
.үү2
.ио2
.үө2
.ис1ти
.үс1тү
.ис1то
.үс1тө
.ис5тр
.үс5тр
.иу2
.үу2
.ию2
.үю2
.кон2трн
.көң2трң
.ле1м
.лә1м
.ль2
.ль2
.ме2ж3
.мә2җ3
.ме3ж4ам
.мә3җ4ам
.ме3ж4ах
.мә3җ4аһ
.ме3ж4е
.мә3җ4ә
.ме6жи2о
.мә6җү2ө
.мо2г1л
.мө2һ1л
.на1ч2н
.ңа1ч2ң
.на1ш2ко
.ңа1ш2кө
.на2и
.ңа2ү
.на5в6
.ңа5в6
.не1в
.ңә1в
.не1з2
.ңә1з2
.не1х
.ңә1һ
.не3о2тр
.ңә3ө2тр
.не5л
.ңә5л
.неа2
.ңәа2
.небе2з1о2
.ңәбә2з1ө2
.нем2но
.ңәм2ңө
.ни1с2к
.ңү1с2к
.нос5к
.ңөс5к
.оа2
.өа2
.об1ла
.өб1ла
.об1ле
.өб1лә
.об1ло
.өб1лө
.об1лу
.өб1лу
.об1ре
.өб1рә
.об1ру
.өб1ру
.об3о2ст
.өб3ө2ст
.об5лив
.өб5лүв
.об5лит
.өб5лүт
.обе2з1о2
.өбә2з1ө2
.обе2с1т
.өбә2с1т
.обо1ль
.өбө1ль
.ог5н
.өһ5ң
.оз2
.өз2
.ос1пин
.өс1пүң
.ос2пар
.өс2пар
.от1р
.өт1р
.от1хл
.өт1һл
.от3в
.өт3в
.ото1м2
.өтө1м2
.по1в2
.пө1в2
.по1ж2
.пө1җ2
.по2дыг
.пө2дүһ
.по2дым
.пө2дүм
.по2дын
.пө2дүң
.по2дыс1
.пө2дүс1
.по2дыт
.пө2дүт
.по2дыщ
.пө2дүщ
.по2ст1ин
.пө2ст1үң
.по3дыми
.пө3дүмү
.под1во
.пөд1вө
.пре1л
.прә1л
.пре2ж1д
.прә2җ1д
.при1г2н
.прү1һ2ң
.при1м2н
.прү1м2ң
.при3к2н
.прү3к2ң
.прис2к
.прүс2к
.про1сну
.прө1сңу
.про3сл
.прө3сл
.прос2
.прөс2
.ра2зо
.ра2зө
.ра2с1та
.ра2с1та
.ра2с1те
.ра2с1тә
.ра2с1тек
.ра2с1тәк
.ра2с1теч
.ра2с1тәч
.ра2с1ти
.ра2с1тү
.реги6о
.рәһү6ө
.ро2х1
.рө2һ1
.сек1с2т
.сәк1с2т
.сеп5т
.сәп5т
.соп1л
.сөп1л
.тек1с
.тәк1с
.топ1л
.төп1л
.тран2с1
.траң2с1
.трех1
.трәһ1
.ть2
.ть2
.уг1ле
.уһ1лә
.уг1ло
.уһ1лө
.уд2л
.уд2л
.уд2р
.уд2р
.уе2
.уә2
.ук2
.ук2
.ур6в
.ур6в
.ую2
.ую2
.фи2зо
.фү2зө
.хим1ч
.һүм1ч
.хла2
.һла2
.ча2е
.ча2ә
.че2ст1в
.чә2ст1в
.чер2ст1
.чәр2ст1
.четырех1
.чәтүрәһ1
.эо2
.эө2
.эя2
.эә2
.юа2
.юа2
.яи2
.әү2
1адм
1адм
1апп
1апп
1атак
1атак
1б2лаго
1б2лаһө
1бв
1бв
1бе
1бә
1бл
1бл
1бри
1брү
1бу
1бу
1бю
1бю
1бя
1бә
1в2нук
1в2ңук
1в2нуч
1в2ңуч
1в2сп
1в2сп
1в2сх
1в2сһ
1в2сю
1в2сю
1в2шив
1в2шүв
1ваг
1ваһ
1вак
1вак
1вег
1вәһ
1велл
1вәлл
1вер.
1вәр.
1вз2
1вз2
1вих
1вүһ
1вич
1вүч
1вл
1вл
1вок
1вөк
1воя
1вөә
1вп
1вп
1вр2
1вр2
1вуд
1вуд
1вы
1вү
1вю
1вю
1га
1һа
1гор
1һөр
1гр
1һр
1д2ворь
1д2вөрь
1д2лев
1д2ләв
1д2невк
1д2ңәвк
1д2невок
1д2ңәвөк
1д2раж
1д2раҗ
1д2разн
1д2разң
1движ
1двүҗ
1двиз
1двүз
1дж
1дҗ
1дзе.
1дзә.
1дневн
1дңәвң
1дняш
1дңәш
1дов
1дөв
1дот
1дөт
1доч
1дөч
1дресс
1дрәсс
1дро2г1н
1дрө2һ1ң
1дроб
1дрөб
1дром
1дрөм
1дун
1дуң
1дье
1дьә
1дья
1дьә
1жг
1җһ
1жд
1җд
1жму
1җму
1зву
1зву
1зол
1зөл
1зри
1зрү
1зу
1зу
1кав
1кав
1кае
1каә
1кап
1кап
1кат
1кат
1каю
1каю
1кив
1күв
1кл
1кл
1ковы
1көвү
1комп
1көмп
1кон
1көң
1коо
1көө
1кос
1көс
1кош
1көш
1кр
1кр
1ла2пь
1ла2пь
1ланд
1лаңд
1леде
1ләдә
1ли2п1т
1лү2п1т
1льо
1льө
1лью
1лью
1лют.
1лют.
1м2нож
1м2ңөҗ
1маг
1маһ
1мед
1мәд
1мей
1мәй
1мен.
1мәң.
1мкн
1мкң
1мон
1мөң
1мще
1мщә
1мы.
1мү.
1на.
1ңа.
1на1г
1ңа1һ
1на1с2
1ңа1с2
1над
1ңад
1ниц
1ңүц
1но.
1ңө.
1ной
1ңөй
1ном
1ңөм
1нох
1ңөһ
1ною.
1ңөю.
1нрав
1ңрав
1ньо
1ңьө
1нью
1ңью
1ня
1ңә
1о2б1лач
1ө2б1лач
1о2биж
1ө2бүҗ
1о2боз
1ө2бөз
1обес
1өбәс
1объ
1өбъ
1окт
1өкт
1отд
1өтд
1отп
1өтп
1п2ленк
1п2ләңк
1п2ленок
1п2ләңөк
1п2леноч
1п2ләңөч
1п2лет
1п2ләт
1п2салм
1п2салм
1пе.
1пә.
1пенз
1пәңз
1печ
1пәч
1пис
1пүс
1плав
1плав
1плаз
1плаз
1пле2с1к
1плә2с1к
1плик
1плүк
1плос1к
1плөс1к
1плы
1плү
1по
1пө
1пр
1пр
1птих
1птүһ
1пу.
1пу.
1пя
1пә
1р2ви.
1р2вү.
1р2вите.
1р2вүтә.
1раб
1раб
1ралг
1ралһ
1реги
1рәһү
1реза
1рәза
1рекла
1рәкла
1рисо
1рүсө
1росш
1рөсш
1рыб
1рүб
1с2каф
1с2каф
1с2клон
1с2клөң
1с2кре1ст
1с2крә1ст
1с2креб
1с2крәб
1с2паль
1с2паль
1с2посаб
1с2пөсаб
1с4творч
1с4твөрч
1са
1са
1св
1св
1се
1сә
1сж
1сҗ
1си
1сү
1скоп
1скөп
1сл
1сл
1со
1сө
1сп2лю.
1сп2лю.
1ср
1ср
1сто
1стө
1стров
1стрөв
1су
1су
1сфе
1сфә
1схе
1сһә
1счас
1счас
1счит
1счүт
1съ2
1съ2
1сы
1сү
1ся
1сә
1т2кан
1т2каң
1т2ре2з1в
1т2рә2з1в
1т2ряс
1т2рәс
1т2рях
1т2рәһ
1т4верд
1т4вәрд
1т4вор
1т4вөр
1такт
1такт
1тека
1тәка
1текш
1тәкш
1терл
1тәрл
1тече
1тәчә
1ткн
1ткң
1тле
1тлә
1толк
1төлк
1торс
1төрс
1торц
1төрц
1точн
1төчң
1тощ
1төщ
1тре2с1к
1трә2с1к
1треб
1трәб
1триб
1трүб
1труб
1труб
1тяну
1тәңу
1узл
1узл
1ф2тор
1ф2төр
1фа
1фа
1фи
1фү
1фл
1фл
1фо
1фө
1фр6
1фр6
1фтонг
1фтөңһ
1фы
1фү
1х2лын
1һ2лүң
1хв
1һв
1хи
1һү
1хлеб
1һләб
1хлор
1һлөр
1хр
1һр
1ху.
1һу.
1цам
1цам
1цах.
1цаһ.
1цв
1цв
1це
1цә
1ци
1цү
1цо
1цө
1цу.
1цу.
1цы
1цү
1чел
1чәл
1чив
1чүв
1чик
1чүк
1чла
1чла
1чле
1члә
1чо
1чө
1чт
1чт
1чх
1чһ
1ш2в
1ш2в
1ш2кол
1ш2көл
1ш2мы2г1н
1ш2мү2һ1ң
1ши2б1л
1шү2б1л
1шпе
1шпә
1шпил
1шпүл
1ште
1штә
1шту
1шту
1шю
1шю
1щи
1щү
1э2к
1э2к
2а1ма
2а1ма
2а3о
2а3ө
2б1д
2б1д
2б1лен
2б1ләң
2б1ля
2б1лә
2б1н
2б1ң
2б1т
2б1т
2б1ц
2б1ц
2б1ш
2б1ш
2б5к
2б5к
2блас
2блас
2бль
2бль
2бр.
2бр.
2брь
2брь
2в1лаб
2в1лаб
2в1лен
2в1ләң
2в1ли
2в1лү
2в1лю
2в1лю
2в1ляе
2в1ләә
2в1лял
2в1ләл
2в1ляю
2в1ләю
2в1ми
2в1мү
2в1ре.
2в1рә.
2в1ро
2в1рө
2в1ры.
2в1рү.
2в1терп
2в1тәрп
2вль
2вль
2вр.
2вр.
2г1б
2һ1б
2г1к
2һ1к
2г1м
2һ1м
2г1п
2һ1п
2г1с
2һ1с
2г1ш
2һ1ш
2г5т
2һ5т
2гроп
2һрөп
2д1инсти
2д1үңстү
2д1к
2д1к
2д1м
2д1м
2д1ро.
2д1рө.
2д1с
2д1с
2д1ф
2д1ф
2д3ш2
2д3ш2
2джс
2дҗс
2дны
2дңү
2доблач
2дөблач
2докт
2дөкт
2дрс
2дрс
2дь3те.
2дь3тә.
2е1ко
2ә1кө
2е1о
2ә1ө
2енр
2әңр
2ж1к
2җ1к
2ж1ц
2җ1ц
2жаве
2җавә
2жавл
2җавл
2ждл
2җдл
2ждь
2җдь
2з1б
2з1б
2з1да
2з1да
2з1инт
2з1үңт
2з1инф
2з1үңф
2з1к
2з1к
2з1с
2з1с
2здн
2здң
2зна.
2зңа.
2зны
2зңү
2и1вы
2ү1вү
2имене
2үмәңә
2к1б
2к1б
2к1г
2к1һ
2к1к
2к1к
2к1ла.
2к1ла.
2к1лак
2к1лак
2к1ли.
2к1лү.
2к1ло.
2к1лө.
2к1м
2к1м
2к1т
2к1т
2к1ц
2к1ц
2к1ш
2к1ш
2казк
2казк
2кл.
2кл.
2кль
2кль
2кн
2кң
2кс
2кс
2л1н
2л1ң
2л1орг
2л1өрһ
2м1в2
2м1в2
2м1изд
2м1үзд
2м1л
2м1л
2м1ш
2м1ш
2н1с
2ң1с
2н1ц
2ң1ц
2н1ш
2ң1ш
2нбе
2ңбә
2невн
2ңәвң
2нотд
2ңөтд
2няш
2ңәш
2о1а2
2ө1а2
2о1г
2ө1һ
2о1за
2ө1за
2о1и
2ө1ү
2о1ры
2ө1рү
2о1со
2ө1сө
2о1те
2ө1тә
2о1тр
2ө1тр
2о1у2
2ө1у2
2о1хи
2ө1һү
2о1э
2ө1э
2о5хро
2ө5һрө
2ов
2өв
2ол
2өл
2ом
2өм
2опир
2өпүр
2остал
2өстал
2осф
2өсф
2оф
2өф
2п1к
2п1к
2п1лю.
2п1лю.
2п1люсь.
2п1люсь.
2п1м
2п1м
2п1н
2п1ң
2п1п
2п1п
2п1сис
2п1сүс
2п1ст
2п1ст
2п1том
2п1төм
2п1ф
2п1ф
2п1ц
2п1ц
2п1ч
2п1ч
2п1ш
2п1ш
2п3ту
2п3ту
2пс.
2пс.
2псе
2псә
2псо
2псө
2псу
2псу
2псы
2псү
2р1орг
2р1өрһ
2р1укс
2р1укс
2рисп
2рүсп
2с1лиру
2с1лүру
2с1лок
2с1лөк
2с1лоц
2с1лөц
2с1му
2с1му
2сбу
2сбу
2ск.
2ск.
2скн
2скң
2сль
2сль
2смен.
2смәң.
2сны
2сңү
2сск
2сск
2ств.
2ств.
2стерл
2стәрл
2стк
2стк
2стн
2стң
2сть.
2сть.
2сфор
2сфөр
2сэ2
2сэ2
2сяз
2сәз
2т1вей
2т1вәй
2т1г
2т1һ
2т1инф
2т1үңф
2т1м
2т1м
2т1н
2т1ң
2т1п
2т1п
2т1с
2т1с
2т1ф
2т1ф
2т1ц
2т1ц
2т1щ
2т1щ
2т1э
2т1э
2тамп
2тамп
2томщ
2төмщ
2тонг
2төңһ
2тр.
2тр.
2трабо
2трабө
2трб
2трб
2трг
2трһ
2трд
2трд
2трм
2трм
2трп
2трп
2трр
2трр
2трф
2трф
2туч
2туч
2ть.
2ть.
2ф1в
2ф1в
2ф1лен
2ф1ләң
2ф1н
2ф1ң
2ф1орг
2ф1өрһ
2ф1с
2ф1с
2х1ве
2һ1вә
2х1г
2һ1һ
2х1с
2һ1с
2х1у2г
2һ1у2һ
2ц1г
2ц1һ
2ц1з
2ц1з
2ц1к
2ц1к
2ц1л
2ц1л
2ц1м
2ц1м
2ц1о2д
2ц1ө2д
2ц1от
2ц1өт
2ц1п
2ц1п
2ц1с
2ц1с
2ц1т
2ц1т
2ч1м
2ч1м
2чтм
2чтм
2ш1ф
2ш1ф
2щ1н
2щ1ң
2юм
2юм
2юю.
2юю.
2юя.
2юә.
2яю.
2әю.
2яя.
2әә.
3в2лия
3в2лүә
3европ
3әврөп
3з2вуч
3з2вуч
3зис
3зүс
3и2мено
3ү2мәңө
3и2мену
3ү2мәңу
3к6ниж
3к6ңүҗ
3ная
3ңаә
3ник
3ңүк
3ную
3ңую
3ны
3ңү
3о2т1ряд
3ө2т1рәд
3п2сих
3п2сүһ
3план
3плаң
3с2лав
3с2лав
3с2лов
3с2лөв
3с2луж
3с2луҗ
3с2посо
3с2пөсө
3хор
3һөр
3ч2мок
3ч2мөк
3чий
3чүй
5би2о
5бү2ө
5бот
5бөт
5боц
5бөц
5вая
5ваә
5вуа
5вуа
5двину
5двүңу
5деб
5дәб
5до.
5дө.
5дью
5дью
5жев
5җәв
5зо.
5зө.
5зью
5зью
5инж
5үңҗ
5инсп
5үңсп
5к6то.
5к6тө.
5коа
5көа
5коры
5көрү
5л6жеш
5л6җәш
5лиг
5лүһ
5лицо
5лүцө
5личи
5лүчү
5мий
5мүй
5минг
5мүңһ
5моти
5мөтү
5нап
5ңап
5нац
5ңац
5ниб
5ңүб
5откр
5өткр
5посы
5пөсү
5прое6
5прөә6
5с2наб
5с2ңаб
5скоя
5скөә
5смес
5смәс
5смы
5смү
5сты
5стү
5течь
5тәчь
5тиге
5түһә
5тиз.
5түз.
5туды
5тудү
5тушев
5тушәв
5хоз
5һөз
5хом
5һөм
5хоу
5һөу
5ца.
5ца.
5чан
5чаң
5шло
5шлө
5штр
5штр
6б1б
6б1б
6б1г
6б1һ
6б1м
6б1м
6б1с2
6б1с2
6б1щ
6б1щ
6бл.
6бл.
6бь.
6бь.
6в5рац
6в5рац
6вн.
6вң.
6вск
6вск
6вь.
6вь.
6г5лай
6һ5лай
6гл.
6һл.
6гн.
6һң.
6гр.
6һр.
6грек
6һрәк
6д1б
6д1б
6д5роз
6д5рөз
6дж.
6дҗ.
6дз.
6дз.
6дн.
6дң.
6дотд
6дөтд
6др.
6др.
6дт.
6дт.
6дь.
6дь.
6евол
6әвөл
6евыд
6әвүд
6жд.
6җд.
6з1ж
6з1җ
6з1м
6з1м
6з1ру
6з1ру
6зная
6зңаә
6зь.
6зь.
6ип
6үп
6й1
6й1
6к1ф
6к1ф
6кв.
6кв.
6кеа
6кәа
6кр.
6кр.
6л1с2
6л1с2
6ль.
6ль.
6льш
6льш
6м1б
6м1б
6м1м
6м1м
6м1п
6м1п
6м1т
6м1т
6м1че
6м1чә
6мс.
6мс.
6мь.
6мь.
6нр.
6ңр.
6нь.
6ңь.
6о5ба
6ө5ба
6одар
6өдар
6окл
6өкл
6окол
6өкөл
6охор
6өһөр
6пл.
6пл.
6пль.
6пль.
6пр.
6пр.
6прь.
6прь.
6пт.
6пт.
6пь.
6пь.
6с1з
6с1з
6с5чу
6с5чу
6скон
6скөң
6сл.
6сл.
6слям
6сләм
6ср.
6ср.
6сс.
6сс.
6сст
6сст
6ст.
6ст.
6стр.
6стр.
6студы
6студү
6стьд
6стьд
6стьс
6стьс
6сь.
6сь.
6т1б
6т1б
6т1ред
6т1рәд
6т1т
6т1т
6твь.
6твь.
6тинж
6түңҗ
6тл.
6тл.
6томс
6төмс
6трв
6трв
6труп
6труп
6тч.
6тч.
6тш.
6тш.
6фр.
6фр.
6фь.
6фь.
6х1ч
6һ1ч
6х5ви
6һ5вү
6хв.
6һв.
6хрь.
6һрь.
6хуем.
6һуәм.
6хуй.
6һуй.
6хую.
6һую.
6хуя.
6һуә.
6ценни
6цәңңү
6ч1к
6ч1к
6ч5лег
6ч5ләһ
6ч5леж
6ч5ләҗ
6чт.
6чт.
6чь.
6чь.
6ш1б
6ш1б
6шв.
6шв.
6шл.
6шл.
6шь.
6шь.
6щь.
6щь.
6ъ1
6ъ1
а1а
а1а
а1ба
а1ба
а1бе
а1бә
а1би
а1бү
а1бо
а1бө
а1бр
а1бр
а1бу
а1бу
а1бх
а1бһ
а1бы
а1бү
а1бье
а1бьә
а1бьи
а1бьү
а1бью
а1бью
а1бья
а1бьә
а1бя
а1бә
а1ва
а1ва
а1во
а1вө
а1ву
а1ву
а1вы
а1вү
а1вье
а1вьә
а1вьи
а1вьү
а1вью
а1вью
а1вья
а1вьә
а1вэ
а1вэ
а1вю
а1вю
а1вя
а1вә
а1га
а1һа
а1ге
а1һә
а1ги
а1һү
а1гл
а1һл
а1го
а1һө
а1да
а1да
а1двор
а1двөр
а1де
а1дә
а1ди
а1дү
а1до
а1дө
а1дра
а1дра
а1ду
а1ду
а1дцат
а1дцат
а1ды
а1дү
а1дьи
а1дьү
а1дью
а1дью
а1дю
а1дю
а1дя
а1дә
а1е
а1ә
а1жа
а1җа
а1же
а1җә
а1жж
а1җҗ
а1жи
а1җү
а1жм
а1җм
а1жо
а1җө
а1жу
а1җу
а1жье
а1җьә
а1жьи
а1җьү
а1жью
а1җью
а1жья
а1җьә
а1за
а1за
а1зе
а1зә
а1зи
а1зү
а1зо
а1зө
а1зы
а1зү
а1зье
а1зьә
а1зью
а1зью
а1зья
а1зьә
а1зю
а1зю
а1зя
а1зә
а1и
а1ү
а1ка
а1ка
а1ке
а1кә
а1ки
а1кү
а1ко
а1кө
а1ку
а1ку
а1кы
а1кү
а1ла
а1ла
а1ле
а1лә
а1ло
а1лө
а1лу
а1лу
а1лы
а1лү
а1лье
а1льә
а1льи
а1льү
а1лья
а1льә
а1лю
а1лю
а1ля
а1лә
а1ме
а1мә
а1ми
а1мү
а1мо
а1мө
а1му
а1му
а1мы
а1мү
а1мье
а1мьә
а1мьи
а1мьү
а1мью
а1мью
а1мья
а1мьә
а1мя
а1мә
а1на
а1ңа
а1не
а1ңә
а1ни
а1ңү
а1но
а1ңө
а1ну
а1ңу
а1ны
а1ңү
а1нье
а1ңьә
а1ньи
а1ңьү
а1нью
а1ңью
а1нья
а1ңьә
а1ню
а1ңю
а1ня
а1ңә
а1п
а1п
а1р6а
а1р6а
а1ре
а1рә
а1ри
а1рү
а1ро
а1рө
а1ру
а1ру
а1ры
а1рү
а1рье
а1рьә
а1рьи
а1рьү
а1рью
а1рью
а1рья
а1рьә
а1рю
а1рю
а1ря
а1рә
а1с2ше
а1с2шә
а1са
а1са
а1се
а1сә
а1си
а1сү
а1со
а1сө
а1ста
а1ста
а1сте
а1стә
а1сти
а1стү
а1сту
а1сту
а1сты
а1стү
а1стье
а1стьә
а1стью
а1стью
а1стья
а1стьә
а1стю
а1стю
а1стя
а1стә
а1су
а1су
а1сы
а1сү
а1сье
а1сьә
а1сьи
а1сьү
а1сью
а1сью
а1сья
а1сьә
а1сю
а1сю
а1та
а1та
а1те
а1тә
а1ти
а1тү
а1то
а1тө
а1тр
а1тр
а1ту
а1ту
а1ты
а1тү
а1тье
а1тьә
а1тьи
а1тьү
а1тью
а1тью
а1тья
а1тьә
а1тю
а1тю
а1тя
а1тә
а1у
а1у
а1фа
а1фа
а1фе
а1фә
а1фи
а1фү
а1фо
а1фө
а1фу
а1фу
а1фья
а1фьә
а1фя
а1фә
а1ха
а1һа
а1хе
а1һә
а1хи
а1һү
а1хо
а1һө
а1ху
а1һу
а1ца
а1ца
а1це
а1цә
а1ци
а1цү
а1цо
а1цө
а1цу
а1цу
а1ч2не
а1ч2ңә
а1ча
а1ча
а1че
а1чә
а1чи
а1чү
а1чу
а1чу
а1чье
а1чьә
а1чьи
а1чьү
а1чью
а1чью
а1чья
а1чьә
а1ша
а1ша
а1ше
а1шә
а1ши
а1шү
а1шо
а1шө
а1шу
а1шу
а1шье
а1шьә
а1шьи
а1шьү
а1шью
а1шью
а1шья
а1шьә
а1щ
а1щ
а1э1
а1э1
а1ю
а1ю
а1я
а1ә
а2в1ля
а2в1лә
а2в1п
а2в1п
а2в1ра
а2в1ра
а2вот
а2вөт
а2дын
а2дүң
а2зри
а2зрү
а2н1об
а2ң1өб
а2н5уз
а2ң5уз
а2п1с
а2п1с
а2п1т
а2п1т
а2с1тир
а2с1түр
а2скоп
а2скөп
а2уле
а2улә
а2ум
а2ум
а2ун
а2уң
а2ус
а2ус
а2уэ
а2уэ
а2ш1лы
а2ш1лү
а2эр
а2эр
а3гу
а3һу
а3и2г1р
а3ү2һ1р
а5ве
а5вә
а5ви
а5вү
а5дви
а5двү
а5з6у
а5з6у
а5ли
а5лү
а5стры
а5стрү
а6нинс
а6ңүңс
а6томн
а6төмң
аа2п1
аа2п1
аг1ва
аһ1ва
аг1д
аһ1д
ага5с6
аһа5с6
ад1а2ген
ад1а2һәң
ад1руга
ад1руһа
ад5рез
ад5рәз
ади2о
адү2ө
адь2
адь2
ае2ди
аә2дү
аз1ве
аз1вә
аз1ви
аз1вү
аз1во
аз1вө
аз1р
аз1р
аи6з5
аү6з5
айм2а
айм2а
ак1н
ак1ң
ак1с
ак1с
акоп5л
акөп5л
аль1д
аль1д
ам1но
ам1ңө
ам1ч
ам1ч
ан1р
аң1р
ан2кро
аң2крө
ан2скр
аң2скр
ан2сп
аң2сп
